District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Home Purchase Assistance for Transit Workers Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. The Government Employer-Assisted Housing Amendment Act of 1999, effective
May 9, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-96; D.C. Official Code § 42-2501 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 42-2501) is amended by adding a new paragraph (11)
to read as follows:
“(11) “Public transit employee” means a person employed by a publicly-owned
mass transit system that is either owned or subsidized by the District.”.
(b) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 42-2503) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) A District of Columbia government employee, a first-responder, an educator,
or a public transit employee; and”.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “with the District of
Columbia or as an educator” and inserting the phrase “with the District of Columbia, as an
educator, or as a public transit employee” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2